Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 3.5
STATE GRANTS TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS

Section

29-3.5-101. Definitions.

As used in this article 3.5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Eligible applicant" means an applicant under a local government assistance program which meets all statutory requirements for eligibility and which complies with all applicable regulations, ordinances, and resolutions.

"Local government assistance program" means any program under which a state agency furnishes a grant or loan of state money, or state property in lieu of money, to units of local government for the purpose of financing or otherwise assisting in any local or regional project.

"State agency" means any board, bureau, commission, department, institution, division, section, or officer of the state, except those in the legislative branch or judicial branch and except state educational institutions administered pursuant to title 23, except part 1 of article 8, parts 2 and 3 of article 21, and parts 2 to 4 of article 31 of title 23.

"Unit of local government" means a county, city and county, city, town, service authority, school district, local improvement district, law enforcement authority, water, sanitation, fire protection, metropolitan, irrigation, drainage, or other special district, or any other kind of municipal, quasi-municipal, or public corporation organized pursuant to law.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1410, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 83:

(3) amended, p. 962, § 8, effective July 1, 1984.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1135, § 52, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(3) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1692, § 91, effective August 7.

L. 2021:

IP and (3) amended, (HB 21-1264), ch. 308, p. 1877, § 18, effective June 23.

Editor's note:

Section 20 of chapter 308 (HB 21-1264), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act amending this section takes effect only if SB 21-288 (chapter 221) becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of HB 21-1264 or one day after the passage of SB 21-288, whichever is later. HB 21-1264 became law and took effect June 23, 2021, and SB 21-288 became law and took effect June 11, 2021.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 240, Session Laws of Colorado 2012. For the legislative declaration in HB 21- 1264, see section 2 of chapter 308, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

29-3.5-102. Selection criteria.

Every state agency which administers a local government assistance program shall approve or deny every application for competitively awarded programs filed after July 1, 1981, from an eligible applicant under such program solely on the basis of criteria established by statute and any regulations authorized by statute.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1411, § 1, effective June 2.